ro-RO: Standardul de montare a cadrului: Cu 12 găuri; În 2 puncte 150 mm; În 2 puncte 165 mm; În 2 puncte 195 mm; Trinity în 3 puncte; Altele
hr-HR: Standard montaže okvira: S 12 rupa; U 2 točke 150 mm; U 2 točke 165 mm; U 2 točke 195 mm; U 3 točke Trinity; Ostalo
nb: Monteringsstandard for ramme: 12 hull; 2-punkts 150 mm; 2-punkts 165 mm; 2-punkts 195 mm; Trinity 3-punkts; Annet
ja: フレームマウント標準: 12 穴; 2 ポイント 150 mm; 2 ポイント 165 mm; 2 ポイント 195 mm; トリニティ3ポイント; その他
zh-CN: 轮架安装标准: 12 孔; 2 点 150 毫米; 2 点 165 毫米; 2 点 195 毫米; Trinity 3 点; 其他
cs: Standardní montáž na rám: 12 otvorů; 2bodové 150 mm; 2bodové 165 mm; 2bodové 195 mm; Trinity 3bodové; Jiné
it: Standard di montaggio del Frame: 12 fori; 2 punti 150 mm; 2 punti 165 mm; 2 punti 195 mm; Trinity 3 punti; Altro
da: Standard for rammemontering: 12 huller; 2-punkts 150 mm; 2-punkts 165 mm; 2-punkts 195 mm; Trinity 3-punkts; Andet
sl-SI: Standard montaže okvirja: 12-lukenjsko; 2-točkovno 150 mm; 2-točkovno 165 mm; 2-točkovno 195 mm; Trinity 3-točkovno; Drugo
de: Standard für Rahmenmontage: 12-Loch; 2-Punkt 150 mm; 2-Punkt 165 mm; 2-Punkt 195 mm; Trinity 3-Punkt; Sonstiges
fr: Norme de fixation du cadre: 12 trous; 2 points 150 mm; 2 points 165 mm; 2 points 195 mm; Trinity 3 points; Autre
hu: Vázrögzítési szabvány: 12 lyukú; 2 pontos 150 mm; 2 pontos 165 mm; 2 pontos 195 mm; Trinity 3 pontos; Egyéb
fi: Rungon asennusstandardi: 12-reikäinen; 2-piste 150 mm; 2-piste 165 mm; 2-piste 195 mm; Trinity 3-piste; Muu
es: Estándar de montaje del marco: De 12 agujeros; 2 puntos 150 mm; 2 puntos 165 mm; 2 puntos 195 mm; Trinity de 3 puntos; Otro
pt-PT: Norma de montagem do quadro: 12 furos; 2 pontos, 150 mm; 2 pontos, 165 mm; 2 pontos, 195 mm; Trinity 3 pontos; Outro
sv: Standard för ramfäste: 12 hål; 2-punkts 150 mm; 2-punkts 165 mm; 2-punkts 195 mm; Trinity 3-punkts; Övrigt
nl: Montagestandaard frame: 12-gaats; 2-punts 150 mm; 2-punts 165 mm; 2-punts 195 mm; Trinity 3-punts; Overige
el: Πρότυπο στερέωσης πλαισίου: 12 οπών; 2 σημείων, 150 mm; 2 σημείων, 165 mm; 2 σημείων, 195 mm; Trinity 3 σημείων; Άλλο
ru: Стандарт крепления рамы: 12 отверстий; 2-точечное, 150 мм; 2-точечное, 165 мм; 2-точечное, 195 мм; 3-точечное Trinity; Другое
lt-LT: Rėmo montavimo standartas: 12 skylių; 2 taškų 150 mm; 2 taškų 165 mm; 2 taškų 195 mm; Trinity 3 taškų; Kita
pt-BR: Padrão de montagem da moldura: 12 furos; 2 pontos 150 mm; 2 pontos 165 mm; 2 pontos 195 mm; Trinity 3 pontos; Outro
bg-BG: Стандарт за монтаж на рамката: С 12 отвора; 2-точково 150 мм; 2-точково 165 мм; 2-точково 195 мм; Trinity 3-точково; Друго
tr: Çerçeve montaj standardı: 12 delikli; 2 nokta 150 mm; 2 nokta 165 mm; 2 nokta 195 mm; Trinity 3 nokta; Diğer
vi: Tiêu chuẩn gắn khung: 12 lỗ; 2 điểm 150 mm; 2 điểm 165 mm; 2 điểm 195 mm; Trinity 3 điểm; Khác
en: Frame mounting standard: 12-hole; 2-point 150 mm; 2-point 165 mm; 2-point 195 mm; Trinity 3-point; Other
pl: Standard mocowania ramy: 12-otworowy; 2-punktowy 150 mm; 2-punktowy 165 mm; 2-punktowy 195 mm; 3-punktowy Trinity; Inny
zh-TW: 框架安裝標準: 12 孔; 2 點 150 公釐; 2 點 165 公釐; 2 點 195 公釐; Trinity 3 點式; 其他
ko: 프레임 장착 규격: 12홀; 2포인트 150mm; 2포인트 165mm; 2포인트 195mm; 트리니티 3포인트; 기타
th: มาตรฐานการติดตั้งเฟรม: 12 รู; 2 จุด 150 มม.; 2 จุด 165 มม.; 2 จุด 195 มม.; Trinity 3 จุด; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Štandardná montáž rámu: 12-dierové; 2-bodové 150 mm; 2-bodové 165 mm; 2-bodové 195 mm; Trinity 3-bodové; Iné